Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-351
Federal savings and loan association; conversion into state association; certificate of approval; supervision.

Upon the issuance by the Department of Banking and Finance of a certificate of its approval of said articles of incorporation, constitution, and bylaws, the conversion of any such federal savings and loan association into a state association shall become effective, and said association shall thereupon be subject to the exclusive supervision and control of the department as provided in Chapter 8, article 3, and amendments thereto.

Laws 1949, c. 7, § 2(1), p. 67.